Alaska, session 34, HB55.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2026 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, unless otherwise indicated. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Legal and Advocacy Services 4,145,500 3,771,400 374,100 11 Office of Public Advocacy 2,807,600 12 Public Defender Agency 1,337,900 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Community Residential Centers 6,970,500 6,970,500 17 Community Residential 6,970,500 18 Centers 19 Health and Rehabilitation Services 10,497,300 9,455,600 1,041,700 20 Behavioral Health Care 8,853,400 21 Substance Abuse Treatment 1,643,900 22 Program 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Education Support and Admin Services 513,900 377,800 136,100 27 Student and School 513,900 28 Achievement 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 21,018,000 21,018,000 02 Alaska Psychiatric 19,911,300 03 Institute 04 Facility Rent, Operations, 1,106,700 05 and Maintenance 06 Children's Services 2,226,900 2,226,900 07 Children's Services 69,500 08 Management 09 Front Line Social Workers 148,500 10 Family Preservation 726,000 11 Foster Care Augmented Rate 500,000 12 Foster Care Special Need 782,900 13 Juvenile Justice 1,709,100 1,609,100 100,000 14 McLaughlin Youth Center 951,400 15 Fairbanks Youth Facility 137,600 16 Bethel Youth Facility 205,500 17 Probation Services 314,600 18 Juvenile Justice Health 100,000 19 Care 20 Departmental Support Services 7,819,800 7,323,400 496,400 21 Coordinated Health and 7,732,800 22 Complex Care 23 Commissioner's Office 87,000 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Behavioral Health 54,045,300 52,428,700 1,616,600 28 Behavioral Health Treatment 32,904,100 29 and Recovery Grants 30 Alcohol Safety Action 1,286,100 31 Program (ASAP) 01 Behavioral Health 9,764,500 02 Administration 03 Behavioral Health 5,987,300 04 Prevention and Early 05 Intervention Grants 06 Alaska Mental Health Board 1,031,800 07 and Advisory Board on 08 Alcohol and Drug Abuse 09 Suicide Prevention Council 619,800 10 Residential Child Care 2,088,700 11 Behavioral Health Facility 363,000 12 Operations and Maintenance 13 Health Care Services 286,800 286,800 14 Health Facilities Licensing 130,000 15 and Certification 16 Residential Licensing 156,800 17 Public Health 4,987,500 4,592,200 395,300 18 Women, Children and Family 2,074,200 19 Health 20 Emergency Programs 1,400 21 Chronic Disease Prevention 2,569,900 22 and Health Promotion 23 Bureau of Vital Statistics 70,000 24 Public Health Facility 272,000 25 Operations and Maintenance 26 Senior and Disabilities Services 18,434,000 16,458,000 1,976,000 27 Senior and Disabilities 1,180,600 28 Community Based Grants 29 Early Intervention/Infant 13,904,500 30 Learning Programs 31 It is the intent of the legislature that the Department direct grantees of the Infant Learning 01 Program to expand service provision from children with a 50 percent or more delay in one 02 developmental area to children with a 25 percent or more delay in one developmental area, or 03 with a 20 percent delay or more in two developmental areas. 04 Senior and Disabilities 2,117,000 05 Services Administration 06 General Relief/Temporary 740,300 07 Assisted Living 08 Commission on Aging 211,500 09 Governor's Council on 254,700 10 Disabilities and Special 11 Education 12 Senior and Disabilities 25,400 13 Services Facility 14 Operations and Maintenance 15 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 82,155,800 16 Medicaid Services 82,155,800 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 Commissioner and Administrative 26,000 26,000 21 Services 22 Labor Market Information 26,000 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Civil Division 100,100 100,100 27 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 28 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 29 federally approved cost allocation plan. 30 Health, Safety & Welfare 100,100 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 02 * * * * * * * * * * 03 Administration & Support Services 5,721,600 5,721,600 04 Mental Health Trust Lands 5,721,600 05 Administration 06 It is the intent of the legislature that the FY27 budget promote transparency by reflecting the 07 existing maintenance and operations costs of the Trust and its lessees in the Cordova building 08 and the Trust Authority building. 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 Alaska State Troopers 50,000 50,000 13 Alaska State Trooper 50,000 14 Detachments 15 Alaska Police Standards Council 80,000 80,000 16 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, AS 18 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 19 Alaska Police Standards 80,000 20 Council 21 Integrated Victim Assistance 1,617,500 1,617,500 22 Council on Domestic 1,617,500 23 Violence and Sexual Assault 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 6,231,600 758,300 5,473,300 28 Mental Health Trust 5,473,300 29 Operations 30 Long Term Care Ombudsman 758,300 31 Office 01 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 200,000 200,000 02 AHFC Operations 200,000 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 University of Alaska 2,675,800 805,800 1,870,000 07 Anchorage Campus 2,625,800 08 Troth Yeddha' Campus 50,000 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 Alaska Court System 532,800 532,800 13 Trial Courts 532,800 14 Therapeutic Courts 4,655,100 4,496,800 158,300 15 Therapeutic Courts 4,655,100 16 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 3,771,400 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 374,100 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 4,145,500 08 Department of Corrections 09 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 9,455,600 10 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 1,041,700 11 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 6,970,500 12 *** Total Agency Funding *** 17,467,800 13 Department of Education and Early Development 14 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 377,800 15 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 136,100 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 513,900 17 Department of Family and Community Services 18 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 32,177,400 19 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 596,400 20 *** Total Agency Funding *** 32,773,800 21 Department of Health 22 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 124,895,400 23 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 3,987,900 24 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & Prevention Fund 20,100,000 25 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 4,412,000 26 1254 Marijuana Education and Treatment Fund 6,514,100 27 *** Total Agency Funding *** 159,909,400 28 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 29 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 26,000 30 *** Total Agency Funding *** 26,000 31 Department of Law 01 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 100,100 02 *** Total Agency Funding *** 100,100 03 Department of Natural Resources 04 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 5,721,600 05 *** Total Agency Funding *** 5,721,600 06 Department of Public Safety 07 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 130,000 08 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 1,617,500 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,747,500 10 Department of Revenue 11 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 758,300 12 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 200,000 13 1094 Mental Health Trust Administration 5,473,300 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 6,431,600 15 University of Alaska 16 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 805,800 17 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 1,870,000 18 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,675,800 19 Judiciary 20 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 5,029,600 21 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 158,300 22 *** Total Agency Funding *** 5,187,900 23 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 236,700,900 24 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 177,371,400 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 177,371,400 07 Designated General 08 1180 Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Treatment & Prevention Fund 20,100,000 09 1246 Recidivism Reduction Fund 13,000,000 10 1254 Marijuana Education and Treatment Fund 6,514,100 11 *** Total Designated General *** 39,614,100 12 Other Non-Duplicated 13 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 14,242,100 14 1094 Mental Health Trust Administration 5,473,300 15 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 19,715,400 16 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 5 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 MH Trust: Essential Program Equipment 500,000 250,000 250,000 10 (HD 1-40) 11 MH Trust: Home Modification and 575,000 575,000 12 Upgrades to Retain Housing (HD 1-40) 13 MH Trust: Person Centered 250,000 250,000 14 Transportation (HD 1-40) 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 19 MH Trust: AHFC Beneficiary and Special 1,950,000 1,750,000 200,000 20 Needs Housing (HD 1-40) 21 MH Trust: AHFC Homeless Assistance 10,150,000 9,200,000 950,000 22 Program (HD 1-40) 23 MH Trust: AHFC Rural Housing 135,000 135,000 24 Coordinator - Ketchikan (HD 1-40) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 MH Trust: Coordinated Transportation 700,000 700,000 29 and Vehicles (HD 1-40) 30 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Health 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 825,000 06 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 500,000 07 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,325,000 08 Department of Revenue 09 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 1,285,000 10 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 10,950,000 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 12,235,000 12 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 13 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 700,000 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 700,000 15 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 14,260,000 16 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1037 General Fund / Mental Health 1,525,000 06 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 10,950,000 07 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 12,475,000 08 Other Non-Duplicated 09 1092 Mental Health Trust Authority Authorized Receipts 1,785,000 10 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 1,785,000 11 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. PURPOSE. In accordance with AS 37.14.003 and 37.14.005, the appropriations 02 made in this Act are for the state's integrated comprehensive mental health program. 03 * Sec. 8. NONGENERAL FUND RECEIPTS. (a) Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 04 authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) that exceed the 05 amounts appropriated in this Act are appropriated conditioned upon compliance with the 06 program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). 07 (b) If Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority authorized receipts (AS 37.14.036) or 08 administration receipts (AS 37.14.036) fall short of the estimates used as the basis of the 09 appropriation, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall in receipts. 10 * Sec. 9. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The appropriations made in sec. 11 1 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for public officials, officers, 12 and employees of the executive branch, Alaska Court System employees, employees of the 13 legislature, and legislators and to implement the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2026, of the following ongoing collective bargaining agreements: 15 (1) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 16 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Transportation 17 and Public Facilities; 18 (2) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 19 commissioned public safety officers unit members within the Department of Public Safety; 20 (3) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 21 (4) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit; 22 (5) Alaska Correctional Officers Association, representing the correctional 23 officers unit; 24 (6) Teachers' Education Association of Mt. Edgecumbe, representing the 25 teachers of Mt. Edgecumbe High School; 26 (7) Alaska Vocational Technical Center Teachers' Association, National 27 Education Association, representing the employees of the Alaska Vocational Technical 28 Center; 29 (8) International Organization of Masters, Mates, and Pilots, representing the 30 masters, mates, and pilots unit; 31 (9) Alaska State Employees Association, for the general government unit; 01 (10) Marine Engineers' Beneficial Association, representing licensed 02 engineers employed by the Alaska marine highway system; 03 (11) Confidential Employees Association, representing the confidential unit; 04 (12) Inlandboatmen's Union of the Pacific, Alaska Region, representing the 05 unlicensed marine unit. 06 (b) The appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of this Act include 07 amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for 08 university employees who are not members of a collective bargaining unit and to implement 09 the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the following collective 10 bargaining agreements: 11 (1) Fairbanks Firefighters Union, IAFF Local 1324; 12 (2) Alaska Higher Education Crafts and Trades Employees, Local 6070; 13 (3) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW; 14 (4) United Academics - American Association of University Professors, 15 American Federation of Teachers; 16 (5) United Academic - Adjuncts - American Association of University 17 Professors, American Federation of Teachers. 18 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 19 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 20 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 21 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 22 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 23 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 24 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 25 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 26 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 27 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 28 accordingly. 29 (e) Appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act for salary and benefit adjustments as 30 described in (a) and (b) of this section are for the benefit of the state's integrated 31 comprehensive mental health program only and do not necessarily affect every group of 01 noncovered employees or every collective bargaining unit listed in (a) and (b) of this section. 02 * Sec. 10. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.